Utah statutes.
78B-11-120.   Award.

(1)  An arbitrator shall make a record of an award.  The record must be signed or otherwise authenticated by any arbitrator who concurs with the award.  The arbitrator or the arbitration organization shall give notice of the award, including a copy of the award, to each party to the arbitration proceeding.

(2)  An award must be made within the time specified by the agreement to arbitrate or, if not specified in the agreement, within the time ordered by the court.  The court may extend or the parties to the arbitration proceeding may agree on the record to extend the time.  The court or the parties may do so within or after the time specified or ordered.  A party waives any objection that an award was not timely made unless the party gives notice of the objection to the arbitrator before receiving notice of the award.

